Georgia, session 2025_26, SB250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Part 3 of Article 16 of Chapter 2 of Title 20 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated,
relating to student health in elementary and secondary education, is amended by adding a
new Code section to read as follows:
S. B. 250
- 1 -

LC 60 0048
"20-2-776.6.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Opioid antagonist' shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section
20-2-776.5.
(2) 'Program' means the Wesley's Law Grant Program established by this Code section.
(3) 'Trust fund' means the state administered trust known as the Georgia Opioid Crisis
Abatement Trust.
(b) Beginning in the 2026-2027 school year, and subject to available funding, including,
but not limited to, appropriations by the General Assembly or trust funds obtained pursuant
to subsection (c) of this Code section, the State Board of Education shall establish the
Wesley's Law Grant Program to provide up to $3 million in grant funding for the purpose
of providing annual grants to participating local school systems or public schools, including
charter schools, to acquire and maintain a supply of opioid antagonists as necessary to
implement the purposes of Code Section 20-2-776.5. Such grants shall be awarded based
on criteria, terms, and conditions as determined by the State Board of Education.
(c) The Department of Education is directed to take all steps reasonably necessary to
obtain funding for the program from the trust fund, including, but not limited to, satisfying
any application requirements.
(d) Nothing in this Code section shall be construed to preclude a local school system or
public school, including a charter school, from acquiring and maintaining opioid
antagonists in accordance with Code Section 20-2-776.5 at its own expense.
(e) The Department of Education shall maintain and annually report to the Governor data
for the three preceding school years, including, at a minimum:
(1) Rates of participation by local school systems and public schools, including charter
schools;
(2) The number of opioid overdoses occurring at local school systems and public
schools, including charter schools;
S. B. 250
- 2 -

LC 60 0048
(3) The number of times opioid antagonists were administered at local school systems
and public schools, including charter schools;
(4) The outcomes of administered opioid antagonists at local school systems and public
schools, including charter schools; and
(5) The impact of Code Section 20-2-776.5, 'Wesley's Law,' on opioid overdoses at local
school systems and public schools, including charter schools.
(f) The Department of Education is authorized to promulgate rules and regulations as
necessary to administer and implement this Code section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 250
- 3 -